Utah statutes.
32A-14a-105 (Repealed 07/01/11).    Action for contribution by provider of alcoholic beverages.

(1) (a)  Except as provided in Subsections (2) and (3), a person, as defined under Subsection 32A-14a-102(1), (2), or (3), against whom an award has been made under this chapter, may bring a separate cause of action for contribution against any person causing the injury and damage.

(b)  The maximum amount for which any person causing the injury and damage may be liable to any person seeking contribution is that percentage or proportion of the damages equivalent to the percentage or proportion of fault attributed to that person causing the injury and damage.

(2)  This action for contribution under this section may not be brought against:

(a)  any person entitled to recovery as described in Subsection 32A-14a-102(1)(a)(i) or (ii); or

(b)  any person entitled to recover as described in Subsection 32A-14a-102(2)(a)(i) or (ii).

(3)  An action for contribution under this section may not diminish the amount of recovery for injury or damages awarded and received to any person entitled to recover as described in Subsection 32A-14a-102(1)(a)(i) or (ii) or 32A-14a-102(2)(a)(i) or (ii):

(a)  in a cause of action brought under this chapter; or

(b)  in a separate cause of action for injury and damage that is not brought under this chapter.

